Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Oregon Department  of Aviation, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,448,406 for the
Cape Blanco Airport runway replacement and electric rehabilitation project.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Oregon Department of
Aviation, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 6,278,127
(2) Aircraft registration ................. $ 193,703
(3) Pavement maintenance ............. $ 2,260,123
(4) General aviation
entitlement
grant program........................... $ 690,693
(5) Aviation system
action program ......................... $ 14,750,082
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received  by the Oregon Department of Aviation,
for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 2,884,805
(2) General aviation
entitlement
grant program........................... $ 6,568,990
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 5004 (HB 5004-A) Page 1
Passed by House May 15, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5004 (HB 5004-A) Page 2